Wisconsin, session 2025, SB267.
do enact as follows:SB267,11Section 1. 183.0122 (2) (d) 1. a. of the statutes is amended to read:SB267,2,42183.0122 (2) (d) 1. a. The student is enrolled in a postsecondary institution in 3this state, in a public, private, or tribal high school in this state, or in a home-based 4private educational program, as defined in s. 115.001 (3g).SB267,25Section 2. Initial applicability.SB267,2,76(1) This act first applies to articles of organization filed on the effective date of 7this subsection.SB267,38Section 3. Effective date.SB267,2,109(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 2nd month beginning after 10publication.SB267,2,1111